South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4672.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 6-1-970 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (10) the purchase of a residential structure for which the purchaser claims the special assessment ratio allowed pursuant to Section 12-43-220(c) in the first year of eligibility if the purchaser claimed the special assessment ratio allowed pursuant to Section 12-43-220(c) on another residence within the same school district for the previous fifteen property tax years. The exemption allowed by this item only applies to fees charged for public facilities for grades K-12 as defined in Section 6-1-920(18)(i). A purchaser exempt pursuant to this item is entitled to a refund of the impact fee if the fee has been paid. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----